District of Columbia statutes.
7-1304.04

Payment for independent comprehensive evaluation and habilitation plan.

If the respondent demonstrates that a comprehensive evaluation of a person with an intellectual disability failed to comply substantially with accepted professional standards and that sound professional judgment was not exercised in the performance of the evaluation, the court, upon a motion of the respondent, may order an independent comprehensive evaluation of the person or an individual habilitation plan at the District’s expense if the person is unable to pay.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 404, 25 DCR 5094
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 506(j), 42 DCR 3684
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 17(u), 59 DCR 5567

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1944.
1973 Ed., § 6-1671.

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “an intellectual disability” for “mental retardation.”

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4(b) of Human Services Spending Reduction Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-29, July 25, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 4002).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 4(b) of the Human Services Spending Reduction Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-35, April 11, 1995, 42 DCR 1834) and § 4(b) of the Human Services Spending Reduction Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-104, July 21, 1995, 42 DCR 4014).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 506(j) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).

Editor's Notes

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.